Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,121
Plan review; state committee; considerations.

In the review of a plan for the reorganization of school districts pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, the state committee shall give due consideration to (1) the educational needs of pupils in the learning community, (2) economies in administration costs, (3) the future use of existing satisfactory school buildings, sites, and play fields, (4) the convenience and welfare of pupils, (5) transportation requirements, (6) the equalization of the educational opportunity of pupils, (7) the amount of outstanding indebtedness of each district and proposed disposition thereof, (8) the equitable adjustment of all property, debts, and liabilities among the districts involved, (9) any additional statutory requirements for learning community organization, and (10) any other matters which, in its judgment, are of importance.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 32;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 21.